Washington statutes.
RCW 44.90.060

Right to strike not granted.

Nothing contained in this chapter permits or grants to any legislative employee the right to strike, participate in a work stoppage, or refuse to perform their official duties.

[ 2024 c 333 s 8; 2022 c 283 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 333: See note following RCW 44.90.025.